Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.550

Tampering with materials.

Any person who willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any of the supplies or materials that the person knows are intended both for use in a voting center, election office, ballot counting area, ballot storage area, or election system including materials and systems meant for enabling a voter to prepare the voter's ballot is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2024 c 28 s 6; 2011 c 10 s 74; 2003 c 111 s 2125; 1991 c 81 s 9; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.110. Prior: 1889 p 412 s 31; RRS s 5296. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1935 c 108 s 3, part; RRS s 5339-3, part, now codified, as reenacted, in RCW 29.85.230. Formerly RCW 29.85.110.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.